Hawaii statutes.
§514A-121.5
Mediation. If an apartment
owner or the board of directors requests mediation of a dispute involving the
interpretation or enforcement of the association of apartment owners'
declaration, bylaws, or house rules, the other party in the dispute shall be
required to participate in mediation. Each party shall be wholly responsible
for its own costs of participating in mediation, unless at the end of the
mediation process, both parties agree that one party shall pay all or a
specified portion of the mediation costs. If an apartment owner or the board
of directors refuses to participate in the mediation of a particular dispute, a
court may take this refusal into consideration when awarding expenses, costs,
and attorney's fees. [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2, §12; am L 2008, c 205, §§1, 5; am
L 2009, c 9, §1; am L 2012, c 34, §13]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next